Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2084
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 71-2084 to 71-2096:

(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services; and

(2) Health care facility means a health care facility subject to licensing under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act.

Laws 1983, LB 274, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 71-6001;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 60;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 612;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 102;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 520.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.